src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_0_НУАВНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** нуавны:нуа
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2^Close Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2 Verb_nyDer_ONSET_VOW ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2 VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2^Close VerbDer_V ; !
:^л2 VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; !a
:^л2^Close VerbConj_V ; !! Consonant-onset
!
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2^C2V Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !NB underlying л = upper в elsewhere HERE vowel lengthening
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2^C2V VerbDer_V ; !NB underlying л = upper в elsewhere HERE vowel lengthening
+Use/NG+Err/Dial:^л2^C2V VerbConj_V ; !NB Consonant-onset  underlying л = upper в elsewhere  HERE vowel lengthening
!
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2 Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !NB underlying л = upper в elsewhere HERE л retension
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@^л2 VerbDer_V ; !NB underlying л = upper в elsewhere HERE л retension
+Use/NG+Err/Dial:^л2 VerbConj_V ; !NB Consonant-onset  underlying л = upper в elsewhere  HERE л retension

LEXICON VR_АРТАСЬНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_nyDer_ONSET_CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Ы ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А/Я ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_АРТАСЬНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_V ; !
+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
+Refl: VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON IV_АРТАСЬНЫ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_АРТАСЬНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_АРТАСЬНЫ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@  V_0_АРТАСЬНЫ ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON BV_АРТАСЬНЫ 
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_АРТАСЬНЫ ;
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@  V_0_АРТАСЬНЫ ;

LEXICON V_АРТАСЬНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** артасьны:артась 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_АРТАСЬНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_АРТАСЬНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** артасьны:артась 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_АРТАСЬНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@я Verb_nyDer_ONSET_А ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_V ; !
: VerbConj ; !а
: VerbConj_V ; !б

LEXICON VR_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ы VerbDer_V ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@я Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Я ;
+Refl: VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
+Refl:ы VerbConj_V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON IV_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ;
LEXICON V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** лыддьыны:лыддь ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** лыддьыны:лыддь ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ы VerbDer_V ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@  VerbDer_ONSET_И/І ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@я Verb_nyDer_ONSET_Я ;
: VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
:ы VerbConj_V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON VR_ВОЛЫНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ Verb_ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ы VerbDer_V ; !
+Refl: VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; ! check this!!!
+Refl:ы VerbConj_V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON IV_ВОЛЫНЫ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ВОЛЫНЫ ;
LEXICON TV_ВОЛЫНЫ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_ВОЛЫНЫ ;
LEXICON BV_ВОЛЫНЫ 
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@ V_0_ВОЛЫНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@+TV:@U.CONJ-VAL.TV@ V_0_ВОЛЫНЫ ;

LEXICON V_ВОЛЫНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** волыны:лыддь ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@+IV:@U.CONJ-VAL.IV@  V_0_ВОЛЫНЫ ;
LEXICON V_0_ВОЛЫНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** волыны:лыддь ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb_ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ы VerbDer_V ; !
: VerbConj_КУТНЫ ; ! check this!!!
:ы VerbConj_V ; ! check this!!!

! First model: ы added as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ны, 
! ярм ----- ы ----/


! Second model: ы added earlier, and not as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ыны, 
! ярм ------------/



! =================== !
!! ## Verb conjugation 
! =================== !

LEXICON VerbConj_V !!≈ * **@CODE@**  суф б -- ы 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ны VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ні VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf+Pl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ныяс VerbEnd ;!OKK:50
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Inf+Pl+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>ныястӧ VerbEnd ;!OKK:50
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Inf+Pl+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>ныяссӧ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@+Inf+Px1:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@%>ным VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@+Inf+Px2:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@%>ныд VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@+Inf+Px3:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@%>ныс VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытӧ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысӧ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытэ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысэ VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3+Err/Orth-i-not-y:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ні VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Sg2:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbConj !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Nonfiniteforms ;

LEXICON VerbConj_КЫЙНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_КЫЙНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_КЫЙНЫ ;

LEXICON VerbConj_АМНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_АМНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Nonfiniteforms ;

LEXICON VerbConj_КУТНЫ !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_КУТНЫ ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_КУТНЫ ; !


LEXICON Finiteforms  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present ;
 future ;
 preterite ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_КЫЙНЫ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_КЫЙНЫ ;
 future_КЫЙНЫ ;
: preterite_КЫЙНЫ ;
: imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_АМНЫ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_АМНЫ ;
 future_АМНЫ ;
 preterite_АМНЫ ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_КУТНЫ  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_КУТНЫ ;
 future_КУТНЫ ;
 preterite_КУТНЫ ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>э PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3

!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧныс VERB_K ; ! dialectal forms
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>эныс VERB_K ; ! dialectal forms

LEXICON present_КЫЙНЫ
 present ;
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_АМНЫ
 present ;
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_КУТНЫ
 present ;
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
!2018-01-29!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3 PresPret1_SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_КЫЙНЫ
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3 PresPret1_SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_АМНЫ
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3 PresPret1_SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_КУТНЫ
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>{ая} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{ая}с PresPret1_SgPl3 ; ! 3 PresPret1_SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON preterite
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі} PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>{иі}  P3 ; ! 3 
	Pret2a_0 ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@@U.CONJ-PX.3@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Ind+Prt1+Pl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@@U.CONJ-PX.3@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{иі}%>с%>ныс VERB_K ; !with s
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@@U.CONJ-PX.3@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Use/NG+Err/Dial+Ind+Prt1+Pl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@@U.CONJ-PX.3@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>{иі}%>ныс VERB_K ; !without s

LEXICON Pret2a_0
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>ӧм Pret2a ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>эм Pret2a ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Ind+Prt2+Pl1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>эмаась VerbEnd_Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Ind+Prt2+Pl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>эмаась VerbEnd_Comparison ;
